src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2018 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no
!
! =============== !
! Verb inflection !
! =============== !

LEXICON V1 !V1: non-palatalized monosyllabic stems
+V	#	 ;

LEXICON V1-CLU !V1: non-palatalized monosyllabic stems; C-cluster
+V+Inf						:%>э 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prs					:%>эй 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt					:%>ма 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%>а 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%>мэнч 			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prog				:%>мэн				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Act					:%>эм				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1				:%^WG%>а			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%^WG%>ам			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2				:%^WG%>ак			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%^WG%>ах			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3				:%>0				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1				:%>эпь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2				:%>бэдтӭ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3				:%>эв				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Ips				:%^WG%>этҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg			:%^WG%>0			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1				:%^CLPAL%>э			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%^CLPAL%>эмь		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2				:%^CLPAL%>экь		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%^CLPAL%>эхь		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3				:%^WG%>э			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1				:%^WG%>эмь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2				:%^WG%>этҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3				:%^CLPAL%>энҍ		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Ips				:%>эшь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg			:%>ма 				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>а 				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>мэнч 			K 			;
+V							:%^WG 				V_COND		;!always C-depal. and V-pal-ablaut?
+V+Imprt+Sg					:%^WG%>0			K 			;
+V+Imprt+Pl					:%>э				K 			;

LEXICON V1-CLU-JE !V1: non-palatalized monosyllabic stems; C-cluster; stem ending on -ч-
+V+Inf						:%>е 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prs					:%>ей 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt					:%>ма 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%>я 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%>мэнч 			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prog				:%>мэн				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Act					:%>ем				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1				:%^WG%>я			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%^WG%>ям			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2				:%^WG%>як			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%^WG%>ях			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3				:%>0				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1				:%>епь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2				:%>бэдтӭ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3				:%>ев				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Ips				:%^WG%>етҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg			:%^WG%>0			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1				:%>е				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%>емь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2				:%>екь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%>ехь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3				:%^WG%>е			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1				:%^WG%>емь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2				:%^WG%>етҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3				:%>енҍ				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Ips				:%>ешь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg			:%>ма 				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>я 				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>мэнч 			K 			;
+V							:%^WG 				V_COND		;!always C-depal. and V-pal-ablaut?
+V+Imprt+Sg					:%^WG%>0			K 			;
+V+Imprt+Pl					:%>е				K 			;

LEXICON V1-GEM !V1: non-palatalized monosyllabic stems; geminate (continuant)
+V+Inf						:%>э 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prs					:%>эй 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt					:%>ма				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%>а 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%>мэнч 			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prog				:%>мэн				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Act					:%>эм				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1				:%^WG%>а			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%^WG%>ам			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2				:%^WG%>ак			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%^WG%>ах			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3				:%>0				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1				:%>эпь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2				:%>бэдтӭ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3				:%>эв				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Ips				:%^WG%>этҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg			:%^WG%>0			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1				:%>е				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%>емь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2				:%>екь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%>ехь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3				:%^WG%>э			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1				:%^WG%>эмь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2				:%^WG%>этҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3				:%>енҍ				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Ips				:%>эшь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg			:%>ма 				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>а 				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>мэнч 			K 			;
+V							:%^WG 				V_COND		;!always C-depal. and V-pal-ablaut?
+V+Imprt+Sg					:%^WG%>0			K 			;
+V+Imprt+Pl					:%>э				K 			;

LEXICON V1-GEM-J !V1: non-palatalized monosyllabic stems; geminate (continuant /j/)
+V+Inf						:%>йе 			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prs					:%>йей 			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt					:%>ййма			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%>йя 			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%>йймэнч 		K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prog				:%>йймэн		K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Act					:%>йем			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1				:%>я			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%>ям			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2				:%>як			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%>ях			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3				:%>йй			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1				:%>йепь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2				:%>ййбэдтӭ		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3				:%>йев			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Ips				:%>етҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg			:%>й			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1				:%>йе			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%>йемь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2				:%>йекь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%>йехь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3				:%>е			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1				:%>емь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2				:%>етҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3				:%>йенҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Ips				:%>йешь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg			:%>ййма 		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>йя 			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>йймэнч 		K 			;
+V							:%>й 			V_COND		;!always C-depal. and V-pal-ablaut?
+V+Imprt+Sg					:%>й			K 			;
+V+Imprt+Pl					:%>йе			K 			;

LEXICON V2-CLU !V2: palatalized monosyllabic stems; C-cluster
+V+Inf						:%>э 				K 			;
!+V+Ptcp+Prs					:%>эй 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt					:%^CLDPAL%>ма		K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%^CLDPAL%>а 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%^CLDPAL%>мэнч 			K 			;
!+V+Ptcp+Prog				:%>мэн				K 			;
!+V+Ptcp+Act					:%>эм				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1				:%^CLDPAL%^WG%>а			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%^CLDPAL%^WG%>ам			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2				:%^CLDPAL%^WG%>ак			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%^CLDPAL%^WG%>ах			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3				:%^CLDPAL%>0				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1				:%>эпь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2				:%>бэдтӭ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3				:%>эв				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Ips				:%^WG%>этҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg			:%^WG%>0			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1				:%>э			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%>эмь		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2				:%>экь		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%>эхь		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3				:%^WG%>э			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1				:%^WG%>эмь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2				:%^WG%>этҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3				:%>энҍ		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Ips				:%>эшь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg			:%^CLDPAL%>ма 				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%^CLDPAL%>а 				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%^CLDPAL%>мэнч 			K 			;
+V							:%^CLDPAL%^WG 				V_COND		;!always C-depal. and V-pal-ablaut?
+V+Imprt+Sg					:%^WG%>0			K 			;
+V+Imprt+Pl					:%>э				K 			;
