src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbstems   !!= * **@CODE@**
аллькэ:алльк V2-CLU ;
аннҍтэ:аннҍт V2-CLU ;
ва̄ннҍцэ:ва̄ннҍц V2-CLU ;
выййтэ:выййт V1-CLU ;!works
едтэ:едт V1 ;
ко̄ппче:ко̄ппч V1-CLU-JE ;!ablaut doesn't work yet; е-э doesn't work yet
ко̄шшкэ:ко̄шшк V1-CLU ;!ablaut doesn't work yet
куллэ:кулл V1-GEM ;
мушштэ:мушшт V1-CLU ;!works
несськэ:несськ V2-CLU "скоблить/ to scrape" ;
па̄шшьтэ:па̄шшьт V2-CLU "жарить/ to fry" ;
пыйе:пы V1-GEM-J ;!or V2?
пэ̄ссэ:пэ̄сс V1 ;!сс>з doesn't work yet
са̄ррнэ:са̄ррн V1-CLU "говорить/ to speak" ;!ablaut doesn't work yet 
севвьтэ:севвьт V2-CLU "обидеть" ; 
тиввтэ:тиввт V1-CLU ;!ablaut doesn't work yet
тӯййшэ:тӯййш V1-CLU "строить / to build" ;!looks like V1, but is derivation?
уййнэ:уййн V1-CLU ;!works
уййтэ:уййт V1-CLU ;!works
по̄ррэ:по̄рр V1-GEM "есть, кушать / to eat";!о̄>оа ablaut doesn't work yet
о̄дзэ:о̄дз V1 "искать/ to look for" ;!о̄>оа ablaut doesn't work yet
уссэ:усс V1 "собирать / to gather" ;!сс>з doesn't work yet
выдзэ:выдз V1 "хныкать / ??" ;
кӯссьтэ:кӯссьт V2-CLU ; 
